Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2904.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 8 of Chapter 150 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by removing the period 
at the end of the sentence ending with “Chapter 64G” and adding:- ; provided further that an 
accessory dwelling unit on a lot of not more than 10,000 square feet shall be subject to no more 
than a five-foot side and rear setback, a five-foot separation between detached structures, and 
shall be exempt from any lot coverage or open space requirement.